Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 7 COLORADO WORKS PROGRAM
26-2-716. County duties - appropriations - penalties - hardship extensions - domestic violence extensions - incentives - rules.

The board of county commissioners in each county of this state shall annually appropriate as provided by law such moneys as required pursuant to section 26-1-122 (6).
(1) (a) (I) The board of county commissioners in each county of this state shall annually appropriate as provided by law such moneys as required pursuant to section 26-1-122 (6).

In the case of two or more counties jointly administering a county block grant under the provisions of this part 7, each county involved shall appropriate the funds necessary to defray its proportionate costs of implementing the works program.

A county department shall keep such records and accounts in relation to the costs of administering and implementing the works program.

Whenever a county anticipates that it may be financially unable to meet requests for assistance from participants, the county may seek additional moneys from the county block grant support fund administered by the state department pursuant to section 26-2-720.5.

In connection with administering a county block grant, a county department shall:

Meet the work participation rate as set forth in the performance contract with the state department pursuant to section 26-2-715;

Report to the state department the information required to enable the state department to track participants' length of time for receipt of assistance and to enable the state department to provide written notice to applicants and participants of their rights;

Provide written notification to applicants and recipients of their responsibilities and options available under the works program, including but not limited to time limits, domestic violence waivers, extensions or exemptions, and services available. Verbal notice shall be provided when requested.

Submit the reports required pursuant to section 26-2-717;

Use an income eligibility verification system (IEVS) to verify eligibility information against federal social security administration and internal revenue service files;

Provide Title IV-D services to participants and require assignment of rights to child support by participants and participant cooperation with establishment and collection of child support, except as to participants receiving short-term assistance pursuant to section 26-2-706.6;

Make available opportunities for participants to have individual development accounts for home purchase, business capitalization, or higher education in accordance with federal law;

Meet the required maintenance of effort as identified in section 26-2-714.

(2.5) The board of county commissioners in each county shall adopt official written policies for implementing aspects of the Colorado works program that counties have the statutory authority and flexibility to determine under this part 7. Such policies shall include, without limitation, a description of the kinds of assistance available under the Colorado works program within the county, any eligibility criteria for assistance that may be unique to the county, and the process by which such eligibility and assistance is determined on an individual basis. Such policies shall not be construed to create an entitlement to any service or benefit under the Colorado works program in any county for any applicant or participant, and shall not limit the flexibility of a county to respond to the individual circumstances of a participant. The board of county commissioners in each county shall make such policies available to applicants and participants.

No person in a work activity described in section 26-2-703 (21) shall be employed by, or assigned to, an employer if:

Any other person is on layoff from the same or any substantially equivalent job with such employer; or

Such employer has terminated the employment of any regular employee or otherwise caused an involuntary reduction of the workforce in order to fill the vacancy with a participant; or

Placement of the person with the employer will result in a reduction of hours, regular or overtime, wages, or benefits of persons currently employed by the employer; or

The position is available due to a labor dispute, strike, lockout, or violation of a collective bargaining agreement.

A uniform statewide grievance procedure for resolving complaints of alleged violations of displacements shall be established by the department of labor and employment.

All state and federal laws affecting workers and employers shall apply to all participants, including but not limited to state and federal minimum and prevailing wage laws, workers' compensation, unemployment insurance, occupational safety and health administration coverage where applicable, the federal "Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938", as amended, all federal, state, and local antidiscrimination laws, and all labor laws affecting the rights of employees to organize.

All participants shall be entitled to the same wages and benefits, including but not limited to sick leave and holiday and vacation pay, as are offered to employees who are not participants and who have similar training or experience performing the same or similar work at a specific work place.

A county may not use county block grant moneys except as specifically authorized pursuant to the provisions of this part 7 and rules promulgated by the state board or state department to implement the provisions of this part 7. If the state department has reason to believe that a county has misused county block grant moneys and has given the county an opportunity to cure the misuse and the county has failed to cure, the state department may reduce the county's block grant for the succeeding state fiscal year by an amount equal to the amount of moneys misused by the county.

A county found out of compliance with its performance contract or any provision of the works program may be assessed a financial sanction. The financial sanction must be replaced by county moneys. The state board shall promulgate rules for county sanctions that include financial sanctions and may include other sanctions. Any moneys resulting from the imposition of a financial sanction shall be transmitted to the Colorado long-term works reserve created in section 26-2-721, but only if the state has not incurred a federal sanction for the same act that gave rise to the county sanction.

County departments are authorized to administer hardship and domestic violence extensions for needy families that have exceeded the sixty-month lifetime limit for receipt of assistance set forth in the federal law. The county departments shall approve or deny hardship extensions or domestic violence extensions pursuant to fair and objective criteria established by the state board. The state board, by rule, shall establish hardship criteria, and each county shall apply the hardship criteria to all participants seeking extensions. A county, in its written county policies, may define additional reasons for granting hardship extensions. A county may not grant hardship or domestic violence extensions for a duration longer than six months.

All participants shall have the opportunity to request extensions in their counties of residence. A participant who has been granted an initial extension may request additional extensions prior to the end of the current extension period. If a participant fails to request an extension on a timely basis, an extension may be granted if the participant demonstrates good cause. Whether good cause has been established shall be determined at the sole discretion of the county department and shall not be appealable.

The state department shall send notice to participants approaching the sixty-month limit on lifetime receipt of assistance pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The county departments shall make all reasonable efforts to contact a participant by phone or in person to explain the extension process and to accept a request for an extension. Participants may also make such requests in writing.

A person who is granted a hardship extension or a domestic violence extension shall be required to complete an individual responsibility contract and shall be required to follow all the terms and conditions of the IRC, including the participation activities required of the participant as a condition of the extension, as outlined in the IRC.

Sanctions and terminations pursuant to section 26-2-711 shall apply during the period of an extension granted pursuant to this section. Participants may appeal adverse actions consistent with sections 26-2-127 and 26-2-710.

The county department shall have thirty days after the receipt of a request for an extension to make a decision whether to grant or deny the extension. When granting the extension the county department shall send notice of such extension to participants. The county department shall send a denial notice to a participant who applies for but is denied a hardship extension due to lack of available extensions or for any other reason, which reason shall be included. The county department shall send a denial notice to a participant who applies for but is denied a domestic violence extension, which shall include the reason for the denial. If the state exceeds the twenty-percent numerical limit on the number of extensions that may be granted under the federal law due to the inclusion of domestic violence extensions, then the state department shall determine how many of those domestic violence extensions qualify as domestic violence waivers granted pursuant to section 26-2-708 (5) and if this determination indicates that the state exceeds the twenty-percent numerical limit due to domestic violence extensions that qualify as domestic violence waivers, the state department shall demonstrate to the federal government that its failure to comply with the sixty-month limit was attributable to federally recognized good cause domestic violence waivers in accordance with the provisions of 45 CFR 260, subpart B.

The state board shall promulgate rules establishing the criteria for hardship extensions and for establishing a system for allocating the number of extensions available for each county.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a former participant from requesting a hardship or domestic violence extension, after the lapse of the sixty-month lifetime limit, when new hardship or domestic violence factors occur, to the extent permissible under state and federal law.

This subsection (5) shall only apply to participation in the Colorado works program, as contained in this part 7.

In the event that a county is unable to meet the need for assistance pursuant to section 26-2-709 (2), it may impose cost-reducing measures, including but not limited to proportionate reductions in such assistance, establishment of waiting lists for such assistance, or elimination of such assistance.

A county that encompasses an Indian reservation shall consult with the respective Indian tribe concerning the administration and implementation of the works program by that county. Such consultation shall include but not be limited to:

Possible exemption of the Indian tribe from the sixty-month time limit of the federal law if that tribe has more than one thousand members and an unemployment rate that exceeds fifty percent;

Collection of statistical data on participants, funding for tribal data collection and tribal administration of federally and tribally funded programs;

Cooperation and agreement concerning when a tribal member shall be referred to his or her respective tribe for assistance in finding work and how the costs for such assistance may be reimbursed by or otherwise shared with the county.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1969, § 18, effective January 1, 2009.)

County departments shall assist families in completing the reporting requirements for transitional medicaid. This shall include informing 1931 medicaid recipients of the transitional medicaid eligibility requirements and the required reporting calendar.

A county department shall assist participants in applying for and receiving the earned income tax credit under applicable rules of the federal internal revenue service.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1210, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(2)(f) amended, p. 766, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2.5) added, p. 303, § 1, effective April 15; (8) added, p. 1361, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

(4)(b) amended, p. 282, § 4, effective March 31.

L. 2001:

(9) added, p. 737, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 375, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 2003:

(5)(f) amended, p. 761, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2006:

(9) amended, p. 2018, § 102, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(c), (2)(f), (4)(b), (5)(a), and (8) amended and (10) added, p. 1969, § 18, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2016:

(9) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 775, § 72, effective June 6.

26-2-717. Reporting requirements.

The state department shall submit, in a timely and accurate manner, case record information on participants to the federal government as required by federal law.

to (4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1970, § 19, effective January 1, 2009.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1213, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2006:

(1)(h) amended, p. 2018, § 103, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1970, § 19, effective January 1, 2009.

26-2-718. Regionalization.

In the event that two or more counties agree to administer and implement the Colorado works program jointly, such counties shall submit resolutions from their boards of county commissioners to the state department that reflect their intention to administer and implement the Colorado works program jointly.

The state department shall make a determination to approve or deny the resolutions and notify the counties within thirty days after the receipt of the resolutions.

The state department, in conjunction with the boards of county commissioners of the affected counties, shall determine administrative, programmatic, and reporting requirements in connection with the joint operation of the works program by the counties.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1214, § 1, effective June 3.

26-2-719. Private contracting.

The state department and any county department are authorized to award contracts for the administration, implementation, or operation of any aspect of the works program to any appropriate public, private, or nonprofit entity in accordance with applicable county regulations, federal law, and the provisions of the state procurement code, articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1215, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1972, § 20, effective January 1, 2009.

26-2-720. Short-term works emergency fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1215, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 278, § 1, effective March 31; (2.5) added, p. 429, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2004:

(2.5) repealed, p. 205, § 25, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1972, § 21, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(c) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2008. (See L. 2008, p. 1972.)

26-2-720.5. County block grant support fund - created.

The state department shall create a county block grant support fund that shall consist of moneys annually appropriated thereto by the general assembly. Any unexpended moneys remaining in the county block grant support fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be remitted to the Colorado long-term works reserve.

The state department, with input from the works allocation committee, shall allocate moneys in the county block grant support fund to counties according to criteria and procedures established by the state department and the works allocation committee.

A county that meets the criteria established by the state department and the works allocation committee pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may request money from the county block grant support fund. Priority shall be given to any county that exhausts all money available in the county's block grant for the Colorado works program for that fiscal year.

A county that is projected to exhaust all money available in the county's TANF reserve and faces a local or statewide natural disaster or other emergency may request money from the county block grant support fund. The state department, with input from the works allocation committee, shall develop criteria and procedures to include use of the fund in circumstances of a natural disaster or other emergency.

The state department, with input from the works allocation committee, may allocate moneys to counties out of the county block grant support fund during the state fiscal year or at the end of a state fiscal year.

If the general assembly appropriates money to the county block grant support fund, the state department shall make a report, as required by section 24-1-136 (9) and (11)(a), to the joint budget committee on any allocations made from the county block grant support fund, including the amount requested by each county and the county's reason for requesting the money, and the amount allocated to each county and the reasons for the state department's decision regarding each request.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1972, § 22, effective June 2.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (SB 18-164), ch. 37, p. 394, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2487, § 10, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-164, see section 1 of chapter 37, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-721. Colorado long-term works reserve - creation - use.

There is hereby created the Colorado long-term works reserve, referred to in this section as the "reserve", that consists of unappropriated TANF block grant money, state general fund money appropriated thereto by the general assembly, including amounts appropriated pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, and money transferred thereto pursuant to sections 26-2-714 (5)(a), 26-2-716 (4)(b), 26-2-720.5 (1), and 26-2-721.3 (1). A county's excess unspent TANF reserves that are transferred to another county pursuant to section 26-2-714 (5)(a)(I)(B) or (5)(a)(I)(C) shall not be considered unappropriated TANF block grant moneys for purposes of this section. Any excess unspent TANF reserves for state fiscal year 2009-10 is excluded from the Colorado long-term works reserve and is available for transfer to a county pursuant to section 26-2-714 (5)(a)(I)(B).

The general assembly, upon request of the state department, may appropriate the moneys in the reserve for the purposes of:

Implementing the works program, including but not limited to:

Funding the Colorado works program maintenance fund created in section 26-2-721.3; and

Repealed.

Transfers that are allowed under the federal law for transfers to programs funded by Title XX of the social security act or for transfers to the child care development fund.

(2.5) Repealed.

Prior to requesting any appropriations from the reserve pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for the purpose of making transfers, the state department shall consult with counties and provide information to the joint budget committee for the purposes of ensuring that all transfers of TANF funds do not exceed the federal limits for transfers and ensuring that the needs of counties to make transfers authorized pursuant to section 26-2-714 (7) and (9) are considered.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), no later than August 31, 2018, and no later than June 30 of each year thereafter, the works allocation committee shall submit to the executive director, the governor, and the joint budget committee recommendations for the use of the reserve for the upcoming state fiscal year. In developing annual recommendations, the works allocation committee shall consider the expected reserves and the Colorado works program needs over the next three fiscal years. The state department-appointed members of the works allocation committee are not required to vote on the works allocation committee's annual recommendations. The county-appointed members on the works allocation committee shall draft the annual recommendations.

Notwithstanding any provision of section 38-13-801, beginning state fiscal year 2023-24, the general assembly may appropriate money from the unclaimed property trust fund, created in section 38-13-801, to the reserve if, based on the most recent forecast, the state is not projected to exceed the state fiscal year spending limit imposed by section 20 of article X of the state constitution for the state fiscal year. The amount appropriated for a state fiscal year shall not exceed the amount necessary to cover two-thirds of the amount necessary to cover the increase in basic cash assistance specified in section 26-2-709 (1)(b)(III)(A). The money appropriated to the reserve under this subsection (5)(a) shall not be appropriated for the purposes set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the general assembly may appropriate money from the reserve that was appropriated thereto under subsection (5)(a) of this section to the state department for the purpose of covering two-thirds of the amount of the increase in basic cash assistance specified in section 26-2-709 (1)(b)(III)(A).

On March 1, 2024, and March 1 of each year thereafter, the state treasurer shall notify the joint budget committee of the amount available in the unclaimed property trust fund that is projected to be available in the next state fiscal year.

As used in subsection (5)(a) of this section, "most recent forecast" means the most recent economic and revenue forecast prepared by legislative council staff as of the date of the introduction of a bill that appropriates money to the department of human services pursuant to this section from the unclaimed property trust fund created in section 38-13-801.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1216, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 283, § 5, effective March 31; entire section amended, p. 429, § 2, effective April 14.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 981, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 281, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 369, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1973, § 23, effective June 2.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-124), ch. 183, p. 697, § 3, effective May 19.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1341), ch. 155, p. 555, § 4, effective April 1, 2013; (2)(a)(II)(B) added by revision, (HB 12-1341), ch. 155, p. 555, §§ 4, 6.

L. 2018:

(4) added, (HB 18-1079), ch. 12, p. 163, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(2.5) added, (SB 20-029), ch. 220, p. 1086, § 3, effective July 2.

L. 2022:

(1) and (3) amended and (5) added, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2487, § 11, effective June 3.

26-2-721.3. Colorado works program maintenance fund - creation - use - report.

There is hereby created the Colorado works program maintenance fund, referred to in this section as the "maintenance fund". The maintenance fund shall consist of moneys appropriated thereto by the general assembly from the Colorado long-term works reserve. The moneys in the maintenance fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the executive director for use in responding to emergency or otherwise unforeseen purposes that are authorized by this part 7 or by federal law and that are necessary for the efficient and effective implementation of the Colorado works program at the state and county levels. Any unexpended moneys remaining in the maintenance fund at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the Colorado long-term works reserve.

On or before February 15, 2009, and on or before February 15 each year thereafter in such years as funding is received pursuant to this section, the executive director shall report to the joint budget committee and the health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, concerning the use of money appropriated to the maintenance fund in the preceding fiscal year. Any such reports must be in compliance with the provisions of section 24-1-136 (9) and (11)(a).

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1974, § 24, effective June 2.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-164), ch. 37, p. 395, § 4, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-164, see section 1 of chapter 37, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-2-721.5. Strategic allocation committee - created - duties - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1974, § 24, effective June 2.

L. 2012:

(5)(a) amended and (5)(b) repealed, (HB 12-1341), ch. 155, p. 554, § 2, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5)(a) provided for the repeal of this section, effective April 1, 2013. (See L. 2012, p. 554.)

26-2-721.7. Colorado works statewide strategic use fund - created - allocations - rules - evaluation - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1974, § 24, effective June 2.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 09-1222), ch. 231, p. 1064, § 9, effective May 4.

L. 2010:

(1)(c) and (6.5) added and (7) amended, (SB 10-010), ch. 58, p. 210, §§ 1, 2, effective March 31.

L. 2012:

(1)(a.5) and (8) added, (HB 12-1341), ch. 155, p. 554, § 1, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

Subsection (8) provided for the repeal of this section, effective April 1, 2013. (See L. 2012, p. 554.)

26-2-722. Legislative oversight committee - created - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1216, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2001:

(4) amended, p. 654, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2001, p. 654.)

26-2-723. Evaluation - state department - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1196, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1174, § 14, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(4)(a) amended, p. 503, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

Entire section R&RE, p. 802, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) and (4)(c) amended, p. 2044, § 77, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2009. (See L. 2004, p. 802.)

26-2-724. Colorado works - screening for substance abuse and mental health problems - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 502, § 1, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2005. (See L. 2002, p. 502.)

26-2-725. Outreach and engagement plan - family voice participation.

No later than September 30, 2022, the state department shall develop an outreach and engagement plan to promote access to the Colorado works program for eligible persons.

The state department shall partner with counties and nonprofit organizations when developing and implementing the outreach and engagement plan and shall incorporate feedback from current and former participants to ensure participants are influential stakeholders in the process.

At a minimum, the outreach and engagement plan must include specific strategies for:

Outreach to monolingual, non-English-speaking communities and families, including a linguistically diverse website and translation of other materials that include information about the works program in the seven most common languages spoken in each county of the state;

Developing culturally appropriate messaging;

Sharing information about the services and supports available and participants' rights and responsibilities under the works program;

How to appeal if redetermination is denied;

Confidentiality protections for applicants and participants; and

Outreach through a variety of settings, including but not limited to social media, schools, child care centers, food banks, libraries, federally qualified health centers, home visiting programs, mobile home parks, head start and early head start centers, and mobile sites.

The state department shall:

Require that county staff working with applicants and participants receive comprehensive training regarding the works program. The training must include trauma-informed approaches to interacting with participants, consistency in communicating information about child care access and assistance, the alignment of a participant's work requirements with child care access and family medical needs, the full scope of options for the participant to meet work and education requirements in alignment with the participant's goals, and the availability of support services for families.

Develop toolkits, manuals, and other materials for county staff, applicants, and participants that include information about child care access and assistance, the alignment of a participant's work requirements with child care access, the full scope of options for the participant to meet work and education requirements in alignment with the participant's goals, and the availability of support services for families;

Partner with counties, nonprofit organizations, and participants to develop culturally and linguistically appropriate messaging and ensure that applicants and participants have access to sufficient supports and communication in the seven most common languages spoken in each county of the state, or, in the instance of a monolingual speaker of a language other than the seven most common languages, use best efforts to provide supports and communication in the language spoken by the individual;

Ensure adequate and meaningful representation by, feedback from, or engagement with current and former participants when making decisions and recommendations regarding the works program, including during any rule-making or regulatory process and other policy changes that impact recipients. To the extent possible, the state department shall ensure that participants involved pursuant to this subsection (4)(d) are diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, age, ability, sexual orientation, gender identity, and geography and that participant feedback has a genuine opportunity to influence substantial changes to the works program. The state department may utilize any established councils at the state and local level that have current and former participants represented or appointed to comply with the requirements of this subsection (4)(d). To the extent possible, the state department shall consider reimbursing participants involved pursuant to this subsection (4)(d) for travel expenses and attendant and dependent care.

Beginning January 2023, and each January thereafter, the state department shall include information on the implementation of the requirements in this section in its report to the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203.

The state department may review and consider information technology solutions for the implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2489, § 12, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.